Florida, session 2026, HB1347.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 483.815, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
483.815 Application for clinical laboratory personnel
license.—
(1) An application for a clinical laboratory personnel
license must shall be made under oath on forms provided by the
department and must shall be accompanied by payment of fees as
provided by this part. Applicants for licensure must also submit
to background screening in accordance with s. 456.0135. A
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1347 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 1347 2026 Legislature
license may be issued authorizing the performance of procedures
of one or more categories.
(2) An applicant who qualifies for licensure under s.
483.823(3) or (4) must provide proof of such qualification,
submit to background screening in accordance with s. 456.0135,
and pay the fees required under s. 483.807 to be eligible for
licensure.
Section 2. Subsections (3) and (4) are added to section
483.823, Florida Statutes, to read:
483.823 Qualifications of clinical laboratory personnel.—
(3) Except as otherwise provided in s. 483.812, a
technologist or technician applicant for licensure who satisfies
the requirements in 42 C.F.R. s. 493.1489 to perform high
complexity testing is deemed to have satisfied the minimum
qualifications for licensure under this part to perform high
complexity testing as a technologist or technician in this
state.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in s. 483.812, a
technician applicant for licensure who satisfies the
requirements in 42 C.F.R. s. 493.1423 to perform moderate
complexity testing is deemed to have satisfied the minimum
qualifications for licensure under this part to perform moderate
complexity testing as a technician in this state.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1347 -00-er